Hawaii statutes.
§490:7-103 Relation of article to treaty or
statute. (a) This article is subject to any treaty or statute of the
United States or regulatory statute of this State to the extent the treaty,
statute, or regulatory statute is applicable.

(b) This article does not modify or repeal any
law prescribing the form or content of a document of title or the services or
facilities to be afforded by a bailee, or otherwise regulating a bailee's
business in respects not specifically treated in this article. However,
violation of such a law does not affect the status of a document of title that
otherwise is within the definition of a document of title.

(c) This article modifies, limits, and
supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce
Act (15 U.S.C. section 7001, et seq.) but does not modify, limit, or supersede
section 101(c) of that Act (15 U.S.C. section 7001(c)) or authorize electronic
delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that Act (15
U.S.C. section 7003(b)).

(d) To the extent there is a conflict between
the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, chapter 489E, and this article, this
article governs. [L 2004, c 163, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next